Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
General Provisions; Additions to and Deletions from State Highway System, 1954-1971
Codes, 1930, §§ 4996, 4997; 1942, § 8021; Laws, 1930, ch. 216; Laws, 1934, ch. 396; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 7; Laws, 1949, Ex ch. 6, § 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 318; Laws, 1957, Ex Sess ch. 15; Laws, 1958, chs. 385, 409, 422; Laws, 1960, ch. 363; Laws, 1962, chs. 423, 428; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 19; Laws, 1966, ch. 486, § 1; ch. 511; Laws, 1968, § 1; ch. 462, § 2, ch. 464; Laws, 1969 Ex Sess ch. 44; repealed, Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 32; reenacted without change Laws, 1985, ch. 537, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1987, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 574, § 9; Laws, 2002, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 539, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.